Missouri, session 2026, HB3505.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 295.030, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 295.030, to read as follows:
295.030. 1. Within thirty days after the effective date of this chapter the governor, by
and with the advice and consent of the senate, shall appoint five competent persons to serve as
a state board of mediation; two of whom shall be employers of labor, or selected from some
association representing employers of labor, and two of whom shall be employees holding
membership in some bona fide trade or labor union; the fifth shall be some person who is
neither an employee nor an employer of labor [and who shall be chairman of said state board
of mediation].
2. At its first meeting after August 28, 2026, the board shall elect from among the
members a chair. Thereafter, the board shall annually elect at its first meeting in each
calendar year a chair from among the members. If the position of chair becomes
vacant, the board shall elect one of its members to serve as chair until the next annual
election.
3. Two members of said board shall be appointed for one year, two for two years, and
one for three years, and all appointments thereafter shall be for three years or until their
respective successors are appointed in the manner herein provided.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3505 2
[3.] 4. If a vacancy occurs in said board by death or otherwise, at any time, the
governor shall appoint some competent person having the same qualifications as his or her
predecessor to fill the unexpired term.
✔